Utah statutes.
58-55-504.   Crane operators -- Required certification -- Penalty for
violation.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Commercial construction projects" means construction, alteration,
repair, demolition, or excavation projects that do not involve:
(i)  single family detached housing;
(ii)  multifamily attached housing up to and including a fourplex; or
(iii)  commercial construction of not more than two stories above ground.
(b) (i)  "Crane operator" means an individual engaged in operating a crane,
which for purposes of this section is a power-operated hoisting machine used
in construction, demolition, or excavation work that has a power-operated
winch, load-line, and boom moving laterally by the rotation of the machine on
a carrier.
(ii)  It does not include operating a fork lift, digger derrick truck,
aircraft, bucket truck, knuckle boom, side boom, mechanic's truck, or a
vehicle or machine not using a power-operated winch and load-line.
(2) (a)  In order to operate a crane on commercial construction projects, an
individual shall be certified as a crane operator by the National Commission
for the Certification of Crane Operators or any other organization determined
by the division to offer an equivalent testing and certification program that
meets the requirements of the American Society of Mechanical Engineers ASME B
30.5 and the accreditation requirements of the National Commission for
Certifying Agencies.
(b)  An individual who violates Subsection (2)(a) is guilty of a class A
misdemeanor.
(3)  An individual engaged in construction or operation incidental to
petroleum refining or electrical utility construction or maintenance is exempt
from the crane operator certification requirement of Subsection (2)(a).
